Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 3. Administration

§ 35-1-240.
Powers and duties.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the department of health, through the state health officer, or under his direction and supervision, through the other employees of the department, shall have and exercise the following powers and duties:

To exercise in Wyoming, all the rights and powers and perform all duties hereunder;

To investigate and control the causes of epidemic, endemic, communicable, occupational and other diseases and afflictions, and physical disabilities resulting therefrom, affecting the public health;

To establish, maintain and enforce isolation and quarantine, and in pursuance thereof, and for such purpose only, to exercise such physical control over property and over the persons of the people within this state as the state health officer may find necessary for the protection of the public health;

To close theaters, schools and other public places, and to forbid gatherings of people when necessary to protect the public health;

To abate nuisances when necessary for the protection of the public health;

To enforce such sanitary standards for the protection of public health as to the quality of water supplied to the public and as to the quality of the effluent of sewerage systems and trade wastes discharged upon the land or into the surface or ground waters of the state, as are or may be established by law, and to advise with municipalities, utilities, institutions, organizations and individuals, concerning the methods or processes believed by him best suited to provide the protection or purification of water and the treatment of sewage and trade wastes to meet such minimum standards;

To collect, compile, and tabulate reports of marriages, divorces and annulments, births, deaths and morbidity, and to require any person having information with regard to the same to make such reports;

To regulate the disposal, transportation, interment and disinterment of the dead;

To establish, maintain and approve chemical, bacteriological and biological laboratories and to conduct or require such laboratory investigations and examinations as it may deem necessary or proper for the protection of the public health;

To make, approve, and require standard diagnostic tests and to prepare, distribute and require the completion of forms of certificates with respect thereto;

To purchase and to distribute to licensed physicians, with or without charge, as the department may determine, or to administer such vaccines, serums, toxoids and other approved biological or therapeutic products as may be necessary for the protection of the public health;

To exercise sanitary control over the use of water employed in the irrigation of vegetables or other edible crops intended for human consumption, and to exercise sanitary control over the use of fertilizer derived from excreta of human beings or from the sludge of sewage disposal plants. The state health officer shall have authority to impound any and all vegetables and other edible crops and meat and animal products intended for human consumption which have been grown or produced in violation of the orders, rules and regulations of the department, and upon five (5) days notice and after affording reasonable opportunity for a hearing, to the interested parties before the state health officer or his designee, to condemn and destroy the same if it deems such necessary for the protection of the public health;

To certify, inspect and exercise sanitary control over hospitals, sanitoriums, convalescent homes, maternity homes, asylums, and other similar institutions;

To establish standards and make sanitary, sewerage and health inspections for charitable, penal and other state and county institutions;

To enforce current sanitary standards, or those that may be established by law, for the operation and maintenance of lodging houses, hotels, public conveyances and stations, schools, factories, workshops, industrial and labor camps, recreational resorts and camps, and other buildings, centers and places used for public gatherings;

To establish and enforce sanitary standards for the operation of toilet facilities in all garages, filling stations and other places of business which maintain such facilities for the convenience of their patrons;

To disseminate public health information;

To exercise all the rights and powers and perform all the duties vested in or imposed by law upon the state department of health, its officers and employees, as constituted before this act, becomes effective; to hold hearings, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses and take testimony in all matters relating to the exercise and performances of the powers and duties vested in or imposed upon the department;

To advise the director of the department about public health issues, programs and policies for the state;

To operate a public health nursing program which may include, but is not limited to, provision of immunizations, evaluation of the need of individuals for nursing home admission or services and the operation of an infant public health nurse home visitation subprogram. The public health nursing program may, where and to the extent appropriate, be administered through or in conjunction with county, municipal or district health departments;

During a public health emergency as defined by W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i), the state health officer may prescribe pharmaceutical or therapeutic interventions en masse as necessary to protect the public health;

Administer the Wyoming physician recruitment grant program provided in W.S.

35-1-1101

;

Develop initiatives and provide information to the public regarding palliative care as provided in W.S.

35-1-1203

.

In carrying out duties prescribed under paragraphs (a)(ii) and (vii) of this section, the department shall:

Develop and require the uniform registration and reporting of medical information by hospitals, physicians and other health care providers as necessary to establish the Wyoming central tumor registry in accordance with the American college of surgeons guidelines;

By rule and regulation establish registration fees for hospitals, physicians or other health care providers required to register medical information with the registry under paragraph (b)(i) of this section in an amount to ensure that, to the extent practicable, the total revenue generated from the fees collected approximates but does not exceed the direct and indirect costs of administering and operating the registry. Fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited in the general fund.

Any order issued under this section that restricts individuals’ movements or their ability to engage in any activity, that applies to individuals not under an isolation or quarantine order and that is designed to prevent or limit the transmission of a contagious or possibly contagious disease shall be effective for a period of not more than ten (10) days. Subsequent orders for the same or substantially same purpose shall only be issued by the governor, with consultation provided by the state health officer and shall be in effect for not more than sixty (60) days.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 67, § 6; 1955, ch. 233, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-25; Laws 1961, ch. 135, § 16; 1969, ch. 218, § 10; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1992, ch. 63, § 1; 2000, ch. 37, § 3; ch. 74, § 2; 2003, ch. 83, § 2; ch. 101, § 2; 2008, ch. 121, § 2; 2017 ch. 194, § 2, effective March 9, 2017; 2021 ch. 168, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

For provisions on vital records, see §§

35-1-401

to

35-1-431

.

As to authority to maintain service of industrial hygiene, see §

35-1-502

.

As to investigation of communicable diseases, see §

35-4-103

.

For provisions concerning quarantine, see §§

35-4-104

and

35-4-105

.

As to examination for venereal diseases, see §

35-4-133

.

As to protection of public water supply, see §§

35-4-201

,

35-4-202

and

35-4-220

to

35-4-223

.

As to disposal of unclaimed bodies, see §§

35-4-601

to

35-4-607

.

As to the duty of the director of the department of health with regard to a food safety system, see §

35-7-123

.

As to license required for any person processing, distributing, storing or preparing food for wholesale or retail use, see §

35-7-124

.

As to public health nursing infant home visitation subprogram, see §

35-27-101

et seq.

As to criminal procedure for abatement of nuisances, see §§

6-6-201

to

6-6-209

.

For present provisions pertaining to swimming pools and public baths, see §

35-28-101

et seq.

The 2008 amendment,

added (a)(xxii).

Laws 2008, ch. 121, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2017 amendment

added (a)(xxiii).

Laws 2017, ch. 194, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved March 9, 2017.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (a), added “Subject to subsection (c) of this section,” and made a related change; and added (c).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(xxiii), deleted “If the duty is not assigned to another entity pursuant to W.S.

35-1-1202

,” at the beginning and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1961, ch. 135, § 17, makes the act effective from and after January 1, 1962.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 168, § 4, provides: "This act shall only apply to orders issued by the state health officer or municipal, county or district health officers on or after the effective date of this act. No order issued before the effective date of this act shall be subject to this act during any period for which the public health order is effective."

Quoted

in

Combined Ins. Co. of Am. v. Sinclair, 584 P.2d 1034,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of employee to injunction preventing employer from exposing employee to tobacco smoke in workplace, 37 ALR4th 480.

Computer as nuisance, 45 ALR4th 1212.

Propriety of state or local government health officer's warrantless search — post-Camara cases, 53 ALR4th 1168.

§ 35-1-241.
Safe disposal of corpses in emergency circumstances.

The state health officer in consultation with the appropriate county coroner, during the period that a public health emergency exists, may:

Adopt and enforce measures to provide for the safe disposal of corpses as may be reasonable and necessary for emergency response. These measures may include the embalming, burial, cremation, interment, disinterment, transportation and disposal of corpses;

Take possession or control of any corpse;

Order the disposal of any corpse of a person who has died of an infectious disease through burial or cremation within twenty-four (24) hours after death;

Compel any person authorized to embalm, bury, cremate, inter, disinter, transport or dispose of corpses to accept any corpse or provide the use of his business or facility if the actions are reasonable and necessary for emergency response. The use of a business or facility may include transferring the management and supervision of the business or facility to the state health officer and granting the right for the state health officer to take immediate possession for a limited or unlimited period of time, but shall not exceed beyond the termination of the public health emergency.

Every corpse prior to disposal pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be clearly labeled with all available information to identify the decedent and the circumstances of death. Any corpse of a deceased person with an infectious disease shall have an external, clearly visible tag indicating that the corpse is infected and, if known, the infectious disease.

Every person in charge of disposing of any corpse pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall maintain a written record of each corpse and all available information to identify the decedent and the circumstances of death and disposal. If a corpse cannot be identified, prior to disposal a qualified person shall, to the extent possible, take fingerprints and one (1) or more photographs of the corpse, and collect a DNA specimen. All information collected under this subsection shall be promptly forwarded to the state health official.

As used in this section “public health emergency” means as defined by W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i).

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 83, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to authority of sheriff to perform duties of coroner, see §

7-4-208

.

As to penalty for mutilation of dead human bodies, see §

6-4-502

.

As to embalmers, funeral directors, undertakers and crematories, see §

33-16-101

et seq.

§ 35-1-242.
Public health nursing. [Repealed]

History.

2014 ch. 120, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; repealed by 2016 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 35-1-243.
Public health nursing.

In exercising its powers and duties under W.S. 35-1-240(a)(xx), the department of health may enter into memoranda of understanding with the several counties separately for the organization, management, delivery and financing of public health nursing and related functions. The county commissioners of each county shall have at least the following choices for organizing public health nursing and related functions:

A partnership memorandum of understanding system;

A state administered public health nursing system with a county contribution; or

Subject to the limitation stated in subsection (e) of this section, a system under which the state contracts with a county for the provision of all or a portion of the public health nursing and other public health functions.

A memorandum of understanding entered into pursuant to this section may:

Specify how the state and county employees will be supervised and disciplined;

Specify the hours that public health offices will be open and the holidays that will be observed and may require both state and county employees in the public health functions to conform to a common work schedule, which may be different in different counties;

Specify which resources, including financial and physical resources, will be furnished by the state and which by the county or other local entity;

Contain any other provisions useful in the organization, management or delivery of public health services.

Any county entering into a memorandum of understanding with the department to provide public health nursing services under the systems specified in paragraph (a)(i) or (ii) of this section shall be allowed to provide services under a different system specified in paragraph (a)(i), (ii) or (iii) of this section at any time on or before July 1, 2018. After July 1, 2018, a county shall not be allowed to change the system under which public health nursing services are provided unless the department consents to the change.

If the commissioners of a county enter into a memorandum of understanding to provide public health nursing services under the system specified in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, at the request of the commissioners of the county, county employee positions assisting in providing public health functions may be transferred to state at-will employee contract positions under W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F) or to permanent state positions, provided that the number of positions transferred under this subsection shall not exceed the largest number of public health nursing positions in the county between July 1 and December 31 of the year prior to the transfer. A transfer under this subsection shall mean payment of monies to the department for the purpose of creating a position under W.S. 35-1-243(a)(ii). Any state employee position created shall comply with the state of Wyoming personnel rules. The department may charge an administrative fee and accept county or other local funds to defray the cost of transferred positions as provided in the memorandum of understanding. The funds shall be deposited by the state treasurer in a separate account. The funds in the account are continuously appropriated to the department of health and shall be paid out upon request of the department as provided by law. Positions transferred under this subsection into state permanent positions shall be paid benefits in the same manner and at the same rates as for comparable state employees pursuant to the state of Wyoming compensation policy. The department’s authorization for employee positions shall be expanded by operation of law to accommodate all positions transferred to the state under this subsection and shall continue so long as the county that requested the transfers satisfies its obligations under its memorandum of understanding with the department. Upon a county’s failure to make all payments required by its memorandum of understanding with the department or upon the county’s request, the department shall no longer have any state positions transferred by the county under this subsection and, upon written notice to the transferred employees and the county, shall follow the state of Wyoming personnel rules regarding reductions in force. All positions created under this subsection shall be included within the department’s standard or supplemental budget request.

Any entity providing public health nursing services under paragraph (a)(i) or (ii) of this section and which maintains a city, county or district board of health under W.S.

35-1-301

through

35-1-309

may enter into a contract with the department to perform public health nursing services under paragraph (a)(iii) of this section pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. This subsection and any contract made pursuant to it shall be operable only for the period for which the department is specifically authorized by law to transfer funds between expenditure series for the purpose of making payments to those entities that operate public health nursing services pursuant to this subsection. The department’s authorization for employee positions shall be reduced automatically to correspond with any transfer of funds from a salary expenditure series to a contract series. All contracts made pursuant to this subsection shall be conditioned upon the availability of appropriate funding and the authority to transfer funds as provided in this subsection. A contract made pursuant to this subsection shall provide, with as much specificity as is reasonable and practical given the time available, the services to be performed, the resources and other assistance to be provided by the state and the outcomes expected.

If the commissioners of two (2) or more counties desire to form a joint powers board to manage all or part of the public health functions in the respective counties, the relevant memoranda of understanding may be modified accordingly and may provide for transition to a joint powers board upon its creation pursuant to the Wyoming Joint Powers Act.

The county commissioners of each county may choose for all or a portion of their county to use, for the delivery and management of public health nursing and related functions, any existing organization which currently delivers any or all public health services.

History.

2016 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)" in the first sentence of (d).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 69, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2016. Approved March 4, 2016.

§ 35-1-244.
Public health laboratory fees.

The department of health may charge reasonable fees for laboratory testing services provided to other state agencies, local law enforcement entities and other individuals or organizations in accordance with the following:

Fees shall be established by rule or regulation promulgated in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Fees shall be established in an amount sufficient to recoup the department’s cost of providing the laboratory testing services.

The department shall only charge fees pursuant to this section if the department makes personnel available to testify in criminal trials as to the department’s laboratory testing results.

Fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be credited to a special revenue account. No funds shall be expended from the special revenue account unless and until the legislature appropriates the funds.

History.

2016 ch. 98, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 98, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2016. Approved March 11, 2016.